Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2126
Bonds; terms.

Bonds of an authority shall be authorized by its resolution and may be issued in one or more series and shall bear such date or dates, be payable upon demand or mature at such time or times, bear interest at such rate or rates, be in such denomination or denominations, be in such form either coupon or registered, carry such conversion or registration privileges, have such rank or priority, be executed in such manner, be payable in such medium of payment, at such place or places, and be subject to such terms of redemption, with or without premium, as such resolution, its trust indenture, or mortgage may provide.

Laws 1951, c. 224, § 10(3), p. 812;

R.R.S.1943, § 14-1626;

R.R.S.1943, § 19-2626;

Laws 1969, c. 51, § 71, p. 319.